Nebraska, session 109, LB867A.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB867A LB867A
2026 2026
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated (1) $-0- from the General
Fund for FY2026-27 and (2) $-0- from the General Fund for FY2027-28 to
the Department of Health and Human Services, for Program 33, to aid in
carrying out the provisions of Legislative Bill 867, One Hundred Ninth
Legislature, Second Session, 2026.
Total expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries and per
diems from funds appropriated in this section shall not exceed $-0- for
FY2026-27 or $-0- for FY2027-28.
-2-